Utah statutes.
48-3a-1055.   Statement of domestication.

(1)  A statement of domestication must be signed by the domesticating limited liability company and delivered to the division for filing.

(2)  A statement of domestication must contain:

(a)  the name and jurisdiction of formation of the domesticating limited liability company;

(b)  the name and jurisdiction of formation of the domesticated limited liability company;

(c)  if the domesticating limited liability company is a domestic limited liability company, a statement that the plan of domestication was approved in accordance with Sections 48-3a-1051 through 48-3a-1056 or, if the domesticating limited liability company is a foreign limited liability company, a statement that the domestication was approved in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of formation;

(d)  the certificate of organization of the domesticated limited liability company, as an attachment; and

(e)  if the domesticated foreign limited liability company is not a registered foreign limited liability company, a mailing address to which the division may send any process served on the division pursuant to Subsection 48-3a-1056(5).

(3)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (2), a statement of domestication may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

(4)  The certificate of organization of a domesticated domestic limited liability company must satisfy the requirements of the law of this state, but the certificate does not need to be signed.

(5)  A plan of domestication that is signed by a domesticating domestic limited liability company and meets all the requirements of Subsection (2) may be delivered to the division for filing instead of a statement of domestication and on filing has the same effect.  If a plan of domestication is filed as provided in this Subsection (5), references in this part to a statement of domestication refer to the plan of domestication filed under this Subsection (5).



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

